New Jersey, session 221, A405.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    General grant of powers.  The authority shall be a body corporate and politic and shall have perpetual succession and shall have the following powers: [(a)] a.       To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; [(b)] b.      To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure; [(c)] c.       To maintain an office at such place or places within the State as it may designate and to organize itself into such sub-departments, operating divisions, or units as it deems appropriate; [(d)] d.      To sue and be sued in its own name; [(e)] e.       To acquire, improve, construct, maintain, repair, manage, and operate transportation projects or any part thereof at such locations as shall be established by law or by the authority; [(f)] f.       To borrow money and issue negotiable bonds for any of its corporate purposes, and to secure the same through the pledging of tolls and other revenues and proceeds of such bonds, or other available sources, and to refund its bonds, and to enter into any credit agreement, all as provided in [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.); [(g)] g.      In the exercise of any of its powers, by resolution to fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls, fees, licenses, rents, concession charges, and other charges for each transportation project or any part thereof constructed or acquired by it.  No toll revenues derived from the New Jersey Turnpike or the Garden State Parkway shall be used or available for any transportation project other than a highway project and all transportation projects other than highway projects shall be self-sustaining; provided however that such toll revenues may be used to finance or support the costs of non-highway transportation projects on an interim basis according to such terms, with or without interest, as the authority shall establish; [(h)] h.      To establish rules and regulations for the use of any project including restrictions on the type, weight, and size of vehicles utilizing transportation projects, and also including the power to exclude from any part of a highway project any traffic other than passenger automobiles if the authority finds that such part is not suitable or sufficient as a highway to carry mixed traffic; [(i)] i.        To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.); [(j)] j.        To acquire in the name of the authority by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, except as against the State of New Jersey, any land and other property, which it may determine is reasonably necessary for any transportation project or feeder road or for the relocation or reconstruction of any highway by the authority under the provisions of this act and any and all rights, title and interest in such land and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways, or parkways, owned by or in which the State of New Jersey or any county, city, borough, town, township, village, or other political subdivision of the State of New Jersey has any right, title, or interest, or parts thereof or rights therein and any fee simple absolute or any lesser interest in private property, and any fee simple absolute in, easements upon, or the benefit of restrictions upon, abutting property to preserve and protect transportation projects. Upon the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the compensation to be paid thereunder shall be ascertained and paid in the manner provided in the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), insofar as the provisions thereof are applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions contained in [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.).  The authority may join in separate subdivisions in one petition or complaint the descriptions of any number of tracts or parcels of land or property to be condemned and the names of any number of owners and other parties who may have an interest therein and all such land or property included in said petition or complaint may be condemned in a single proceeding; provided, however, that separate awards be made for each tract or parcel of land or property; and provided, further, that each of said tracts or parcels of land or property lies wholly in or has a substantial part of its value lying wholly within the same county. Upon the filing of such petition or complaint or at any time thereafter the authority may file with the clerk of the county in which such property is located and also with the Clerk of the Superior Court a declaration of taking, signed by the authority, declaring that possession of one or more of the tracts or parcels of land or property described in the petition or complaint is thereby being taken by and for the use of the authority.  The said declaration of taking shall be sufficient if it sets forth: (1) a description of each tract or parcel of land or property to be so taken sufficient for the identification thereof, to which there may or may not be attached a plan or map thereof; (2) a statement of the estate or interest in the said land or property being taken; and (3) a statement of the sum of money estimated by the authority by resolution to be just compensation for the taking of the estate or interest in each tract or parcel of land or property described in said declaration. Upon the filing of the said declaration, the authority shall deposit with the Clerk of the Superior Court the amount of the estimated compensation stated in said declaration. Upon the filing of the said declaration as aforesaid and depositing with the Clerk of the Superior Court the amount of the estimated compensation stated in said declaration, the authority, without other process or proceedings, shall be entitled to the exclusive possession and use of each tract of land or property described in said declaration and may forthwith enter into and take possession of said land or property, it being the intent of this provision that the proceedings for compensation or any other proceedings relating to the taking of said land or interest therein or other property shall not delay the taking of possession thereof and the use thereof by the authority for the purpose or purposes for which the authority is authorized by law to acquire or condemn such land or other property or interest therein. The authority shall cause notice of the filing of said declaration and the making of said deposit to be served upon each party in interest named in the petition residing in this State, either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at [his] the persons residence, if known, and upon each party in interest residing out of the State, by mailing a copy thereof to [him at his] the person at the persons residence, if known. In the event that the residence of any such party or the name of such party is unknown, such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper published or circulating in the county or counties in which the land is located.  Upon the application of any party in interest and after notice to other parties in interest, including the authority, any judge of the Superior Court assigned to sit for said county may order that the money deposited with the Clerk of the Superior Court or any part thereof be paid forthwith to the person or persons entitled thereto for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in said proceeding; provided, that each such person shall have filed with the Clerk of the Superior Court a consent in writing that, in the event the award in the condemnation proceeding shall be less than the amount deposited, the court, after notice as herein provided and hearing, may determine [his] the persons liability, if any, for the return of such difference or any part thereof and enter judgment therefor.  If the amount of the award as finally determined shall exceed the amount so deposited, the person or persons to whom the award is payable shall be entitled to recover from the authority the difference between the amount of the deposit and the amount of the award, with interest at the rate of six per centum (6%) per annum thereon from the date of making the deposit.  If the amount of the award shall be less than the amount so deposited, the Clerk of the Superior Court shall return the difference between the amount of the award and the deposit to the authority, unless the amount of the deposit or any part thereof shall have theretofore been distributed, in which event the court, on petition of the authority and notice to all persons interested in the award and affording them an opportunity to be heard, shall enter judgment in favor of the authority for such difference against the party or parties liable for the return thereof.  The authority shall cause notice of the date fixed for such hearing to be served upon each party thereto residing in this State, either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at [his] the persons residence, if known, and upon each party residing out of the State, by mailing a copy to [him at his] the person at the persons residence, if known.  In the event that the residence of any party or the name of such party is unknown, such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper published or circulating in the county or counties in which the land is located.  Such service, mailing, or publication shall be made at least 10 days before the date fixed for such hearing. Whenever under the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971["] ," P.L.1971, c.361 (C. 20:3-1 et seq.), the amount of the award may be paid into court, payment may be made into the Superior Court and may be distributed according to law; [(k)] k.      To designate the locations, and establish, limit and control such points of ingress to and egress from each highway or transportation project as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the authority to insure the proper operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance to such project from any point or points not so designated; [(l)] l.        To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.) and to enter into contracts with federal, State and local governments and private entities for the financing, administration, operation, management, and construction of transportation projects; [(m)] m.    To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the authority, as the authority deems advisable, and to employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction [and] experts, financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other similarly situated employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment; to fix their compensation; and to promote and discharge such officers, employees, and agents, all without regard to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes; [(n)] n.      To receive and accept from any federal agency, subject to the approval of the Governor, grants for or in aid of the acquisition or construction of any transportation project or any part thereof, and to receive and accept aid or contributions, from any source, of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made; [(o)] o.      To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly or impliedly granted in [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.); [(p)] p.      Subject to any agreement with the bondholders, to invest moneys of the authority not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds, in such obligations, securities, and other investments as the authority shall deem prudent; [(q)] q.      To apply for, receive, and accept from any federal agency, any bistate agency, or the State and any subdivision thereof, grants for or in aid of the planning, acquisition, management, maintenance, operation, or construction of any project, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any other public or private source, of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which those grants and contributions may be made; [(r)] r.        To procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and to indemnify against loss or damage to property from any cause, including the loss of use and occupancy and business interruption, death or injury of any person, employee liability, any act of any member, officer, employee, or servant of the authority, whether part-time, compensated, or uncompensated, in the performance of the duties of office or employment or any other insurable risk or any other losses in connection with property, operations, assets, or obligations in any amounts and from any insurers as are deemed desirable.  In addition, the authority may carry its own liability insurance; [(s)] s.       To adopt regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to [provide open and competitive procedures for awarding contracts for towing and storage services.  Towing and storage services on a highway project may be provided on a rotating basis, provided that the authority determines that there would be no additional cost to the authority, excepting administrative costs, as a result of those services being provided on a rotating basis. The regulations shall fix maximum towing and storage fees, and establish objective criteria to be considered in awarding a contract for towing and storage services which shall include, but shall not be limited to, reliability, experience, response time, acceptance of credit cards and prepaid towing contracts, adequate equipment to safely handle a sufficient volume of common vehicle types under a variety of traffic and weather conditions, location of storage and repair facilities, security of vehicles towed or stored, financial return to the authority, maintenance of adequate liability insurance, and appropriate safeguards to protect the personal safety of customers, including considerations related to the criminal background of employees.  The Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall provide, at the authority's request, a report to the authority on any prospective contractor for which the division has information relevant to the prospective contractor's service record, subject to the provisions of the New Jersey consumer fraud act, P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.).  The Division of Insurance Fraud Prevention in the Department of Banking and Insurance also shall provide, at the authority's request, a report to the authority on any prospective contractor for which the division has information relevant to the prospective contractor's service record, subject to the "New Jersey Insurance Fraud Prevention Act," P.L.1983, c.320 (C.17:33A-1 et seq.)] allow motor vehicle operators on the authoritys toll roads to select a towing company for the provision of towing and storage services, provided however, that the authority may award contracts for towing and storage of motor vehicles deemed abandoned; [(t)] t.        To adopt, prior to the Transfer Date and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations on such terms as otherwise provided for in this act for the retirement by defeasance, redemption, secondary market purchase, tender payment at maturity, or otherwise, of all of the New Jersey Highway Authority's outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations, as if the Transfer Date transferring to the authority the rights, duties, and obligations to operate, maintain, and manage the Garden State Parkway had already occurred; and [(u)] u.      To transfer, sell, dispose of, or otherwise relinquish all right, title, or interest in the Garden State Arts Center, and any related or auxiliary facilities, to the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority, established by P.L.1971, c.137 (C.5:10-1 et seq.), or to any other entity, according to such terms and process as the authority may establish in its discretion. (cf: P.L.2003, c.79, s.9) 2.    Section 7 of P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-7) is amended to read as follows: 7.    The authority shall have the following powers: a.     To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; b.    To adopt an official common seal and alter it at its pleasure; c.     To maintain an office at a place or places within the State as it may designate; d.    To sue and be sued in its own name; e.     To acquire, construct, maintain, operate, and support projects; f.     To assist in planning for the development of the transportation system in South Jersey, in conjunction with federal, State, local, and other public entities, as appropriate; g.    To acquire, construct, maintain, and operate feeder roads; h.    To issue bonds or notes of the authority for the purposes of this act and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof as provided in this act; i.     In the exercise of any of its powers, to fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls, fares, passenger facility charges, or other charges for transit over or use of any project of the authority, including but not limited to any reduced fare or charge programs as deemed appropriate by the authority; and to determine levels of service to be provided by the authority either directly or by contract.  Any revenues collected shall be available to the authority for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.); j.     To set and collect rents, fees, charges, or other payments for the lease, use, occupancy or disposition of properties owned or leased by the authority.  Any revenues collected shall be available to the authority for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.); k.    To enter into contracts with any public or private entity to operate motorbus regular route service, motorbus charter service, marine passenger service, rail passenger service, and air passenger service or portions or functions thereof; however, these contracts shall not supplant any services operated pursuant to the "New Jersey Public Transportation Act of 1979," P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); l.     To acquire, lease as lessee or lessor, own, rent, use, hold, and dispose of real property and personal property or any interest therein, in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.); m.   To acquire in the name of the authority by purchase, gift or otherwise, on terms and conditions and in a manner as the authority may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain except as against the State of New Jersey, any land and other property which the authority may determine is necessary for any project or for the relocation or reconstruction of any public highway by the authority under the provisions of [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.) or the construction of any feeder road which the authority is or may be authorized to construct and any and all rights, title, and interest in that land and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways, or parkways owned by or in which the State of New Jersey or any county, municipality, or other governmental subdivision of South Jersey or any other federal, State or local government entity has any right, title, or interest, or parts thereof or rights therein, and any fee simple absolute or any lesser interest in private property, and any fee simple absolute in, easements upon, or the benefit of restrictions upon abutting property to preserve and protect projects; n.    To grant by franchise, lease, or otherwise, the use of any project, facility, or property owned and controlled by the authority to any person for the consideration and for the period or periods of time and upon terms and conditions as are agreed upon, including but not limited to, the condition that the lessee may construct or provide any buildings or structures for the project facility or property or portions thereof; o.    To locate and designate, and to establish, limit, and control points of ingress to and egress from each project as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the authority to insure the proper operation and maintenance of that project and to prohibit entrance to a project from any point or points not so designated; p.    Subject to the limitations of [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.), to acquire, construct, maintain, or operate any public highway connecting with any one or more projects which in the opinion of the authority will increase the use of a project or projects, to take over for construction, maintenance or operation any existing public highway as a feeder road and to realign any existing public highway and build additional sections of road over new alignment in connection with that existing public highway; q.    To establish rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as are necessary for the management and regulation of its affairs, the use, maintenance, and operation of the transportation system, any project, the properties of the authority and the provision of paratransit services to and from any transportation project and to establish a plan for the management, control and regulation of motorbus regular route and motorbus charter services, except for those services which are operated pursuant to the "New Jersey Public Transportation Act of 1979," P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); r.     To apply for, receive and accept from any federal agency, any bi-State agency, or the State and any subdivision thereof, subject to the approval of the commissioner, grants for or in aid of the planning, acquisition, or construction of any project, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any other public or private source, of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which those grants and contributions may be made; s.     Subject to the limitations of [this act] the "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.), to determine the location, type, and character of any project and all other matters in connection with the project; t.     Subject to the rights and security interests of the holders from time to time of bonds or notes issued by the authority, to enter into contracts with the State or the department or the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, providing for the payment from the revenues of the authority to the State or to the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority of the amount or amounts of revenues that may be set forth in or determined in accordance with the contracts, provided, that the payments shall be used solely for financing projects in South Jersey, including the payment of principal and interest on any bonds, notes or other obligations issued or entered into by the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, the proceeds of which shall be allocated by the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority to projects within South Jersey; any contracts authorized pursuant to this subsection may include conditions and covenants necessary and desirable to facilitate the issuance and sale of bonds, notes, and other obligations of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority; u.    To enter into contracts or agreements with any entity for the entity to issue bonds or notes on behalf of the authority and to make payments to the entity to secure those bonds or notes; v.    To establish any reserves, funds, or accounts as may be deemed necessary by the authority and to deposit authority revenues in interest bearing accounts or in the State of New Jersey Cash Management Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1977 c.281 (C.52:18A-90.4); w.   To procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnify against loss or damage to property from any cause, including the loss of use and occupancy and business interruption, death or injury of any person, employee liability, any act of any member, officer, employee, or servant of the authority, whether part-time, compensated, or uncompensated, in the performance of the duties of office or employment or any other insurable risk or any other losses in connection with property, operations, assets, or obligations in any amounts and from any insurers as are deemed desirable.  In addition, the authority may carry its own liability insurance; [and] x.    To enter into any and all agreements or contracts, execute any and all instruments, and do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the authority or to carry out any power expressly given in [this act] "South Jersey Transportation Authority Act," P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-1 et seq.); and y.    To adopt regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to allow motor vehicle operators on the authoritys toll roads to select a towing company for the provision of towing and storage services, provided however, that the authority may award contracts for towing and storage of motor vehicles deemed abandoned. (cf: P.L.1991, c.252, s.7) 3.    R.S.32:14-20 is amended to read as follows: 32:14-20. a. (1) The Palisades Interstate Park Commission may erect and operate elevators and escalators at such places in the park as it may deem necessary or expedient. The commission may provide and operate or provide by lease, charter, concession, exclusive or nonexclusive privilege, or otherwise, for the operation of such other facilities, including hotels, restaurants, stands, booths, amusements, docks, wharves, and any and all means of transportation to, from or in the park, for the use and enjoyment of the park by the public and for increasing the accessibility thereof to the public as it may deem to be necessary or expedient.  The commission may also provide at its discretion, by proper rules or regulations, the terms upon and the manner in which those facilities may be used.  The commission shall not issue or consent to licenses, privileges, or franchises to individuals or corporations for the operation for private profit of any facility, utility, or device within the portions of the park in this State, except upon terms which will limit the operation of those licenses, franchises, or privileges to a period not exceeding 20 years in any event. (2)   No such license, privilege, or franchise shall be authorized or awarded except after proper advertisement and to the responsible person who will, in open competition, offer to pay to the commission the highest return therefor. (3)   All proceeds derived from the operation of those facilities or from any of the operations of the commission in this State shall be used by the commission for the development and management of the portions of the park in this State. b.    (1)  The commission shall [have power to make, alter, amend, and repeal rules and] adopt regulations for the use and government of the park as located within the limits of the State of New Jersey, and of those parts of the State, county, and other public highways as lie within the boundaries of those portions of the park and of all lands, parks, and parkways in this State under the jurisdiction of the commission.  No rule or regulation made by the commission relating to traffic on the roads under the jurisdiction of the commission in the State of New Jersey shall require the approval of any other commission or of any board, nor the holding of a public hearing in connection with the adoption of the rule or regulation. No rule or regulation heretofore made by the commission relating to traffic shall be deemed to have required the approval of any other commission or board, or the holding of any public hearing in connection with the adoption of the rule or regulation. (2)   The commission shall adopt regulations to allow motor vehicle operators on the Palisades Interstate Parkway or any road  under the jurisdiction of the commission to select a towing company for the provision of towing and storage services, provided however that the commission may award contracts for towing and storage of motor vehicles deemed abandoned. c.     (1)  If a person violates any rule or regulation adopted or issued by the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, the commission may institute a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief to prohibit and prevent the violation and the court may proceed in a summary manner. (2)   (a)  A person who violates any rule or regulation adopted or issued by the commission pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall be guilty of a petty disorderly persons offense. (b)   In addition, a person who violates any rule or regulation adopted or issued by the commission pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall be liable to a civil penalty of not less than $50 nor more than $1,500, plus restitution if applicable, for each offense, to be collected in a civil action by a summary proceeding under the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c. 274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.) or in any case before a court of competent jurisdiction wherein injunctive relief has been requested.  The Superior Court and municipal courts shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine violations of subsection a. of this section.  If the violation is of a continuing nature, each day during which it continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.  If the violation results in pecuniary gain to the violator, or the violator willfully or wantonly causes injury or damage to property, including but not limited to natural resources, the violator shall be liable to an additional civil penalty equal to three times the value of the pecuniary gain or injury or damage to property. (c)   Penalties assessed pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to any other civil or criminal penalties that may be applicable pursuant to law. (cf: P.L.2005, c.330, s.3) 4.    The following sections are repealed: Section 2 of P.L.2002, c.77 (C.27:23-6.2); and Section 3 of P.L.2002, c.77 (C.27:25A-8.1). 5.    a.  Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect immediately. b.    Section 3 of this act shall take effect upon the enactment into law by the State of New York of legislation having an identical effect as section 3 of this act; but if the State of New York shall already have enacted such legislation, section 3 of this act shall take effect immediately. c.     Section 4 of this act shall take effect upon the effective date of the regulations promulgated pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this act.